Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 10 Eastern States’ Exposition Building

37-10-1.
Building authorized.

The state of Rhode Island is hereby authorized and empowered to construct, operate, and maintain a Rhode Island building at the eastern states’ exposition at West Springfield, in the commonwealth of Massachusetts, to be designated and constructed for the purpose of exhibiting the resources, products, and general development of the state of Rhode Island, and for advertising its agricultural, industrial, recreational, and educational possibilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-1

.

37-10-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 351, § 3. The legislative authority for the eastern states’ exposition commission was to have ceased as of June 30, 1979 by P.L. 1978, ch. 387, § 1.

37-10-3.
Acceptance and deposit of contributions.

The director of the department of environmental management shall act as an agent of the state for the purpose of receiving, by means of public subscription, gifts, and bequests, and shall deposit all money so received in any bank or banks in this state in which the funds of the state may be lawfully kept, in a special account to be known as the “eastern states’ exposition fund.”

When the director of the department of environmental management shall have obtained by public subscription as aforesaid the sum of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), he or she shall certify that fact to the director of administration and shall deliver unto the general treasurer such money as he or she shall have received, as herein provided and as heretofore received pursuant to the provisions of chapter 2053 of the public laws of 1948.

In the event that the money received by the director of the department of environmental management which, when added to the sum appropriated pursuant to § 4 of chapter 3675 of the public laws of 1956, shall be insufficient to cover the total cost of constructing, equipping, landscaping, and site improvement for the Rhode Island building at the eastern states’ exposition, as indicated in a firm budget for the same to be prepared by the director of administration, the director of the department of environmental management shall continue to act for the purpose of receiving the additional money or gifts in kind as are needed to complete the same. No construction or contract for construction of the building shall be entered into until the additional money or gifts in kind have been received, credited, and delivered as aforesaid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-3

; P.L. 1979, ch. 351, § 4.

37-10-4.
Disbursement of funds.

The sum appropriated in § 4 of chapter 3675 of the public laws of 1956 and all sums received by the general treasurer pursuant to §

37-10-3

shall be maintained in a special account. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums, or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of vouchers duly authenticated and approved by the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-4

.

37-10-5.
Title to land.

No construction or contract for construction of the building shall be entered into until title to the land is gratuitously conveyed to the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-5

.

37-10-6.
Construction, operation and maintenance of building.

The building shall be constructed under the direction of the director of administration. The operation and maintenance of the building shall be under the supervision of the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, §§ 6, 7; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-6

.

37-10-7.
Use of building — Appropriation.

The director of the Rhode Island economic development corporation, with the advice of the director of the department of environmental management, may rent the building or parts of the building for exhibition and other rental purposes to those persons who will promote the general development of the state by advertising the agricultural, industrial, recreational, and educational possibilities of the state. All rents or rates shall be paid to and receipted for by the general treasurer for use by the state. The operation and maintenance of the exhibitions and other rental purposes shall be under the supervision of the director of the Rhode Island economic development corporation.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the operation and maintenance of the building, for the operation and maintenance of the exhibitions, and for other purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3675, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

37-10-7

; P.L. 1959, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 351, § 4.